Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 148.3, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: An applicant for a license to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery , or the applicantâs designee, shall present to the board all of the following: Sec. 2. Section 148.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsections: Senate File 2184, p. 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to set the term of a license to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, but shall not require a license to be renewed more often than once every three years. A license to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery shall expire on the licenseeâs birthday. NEW SUBSECTION . 6. The board shall issue a final decision of an application for a license to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery within forty-five calendar days of receipt of the application, unless the board notifies the applicant or the applicantâs designee, and, if applicable, the applicantâs employer, of specific concerns that are delaying the final review of the application. In no event shall the board fail to issue a final decision on an application within seventy-five calendar days of receipt of all necessary documentation from the applicant or the applicantâs designee. Sec. 3. Section 148.11A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2. a. An application for an administrative medicine license shall be made to the board. An applicant for an administrative medicine license shall meet all of the requirements established in section 148.3 and any additional requirements established by the board by rule. The board shall also adopt rules governing the initial issuance and renewal of administrative medicine licenses and establishing fees therefor. All license and renewal fees shall be paid to the board. b. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to set the term of an administrative medicine license, but shall not require an administrative license to be renewed more often than once every three years. An administrative medicine license shall expire on the licenseeâs birthday. c. The board shall issue a final decision on an application for an administrative medicine license within forty-five calendar days of receipt of the application, unless the board notifies the applicant or the applicantâs designee and, if applicable, the applicantâs employer, of specific concerns that are delaying the final review of the application. In no Senate File 2184, p. 3 event shall the board fail to issue a final decision on an application within seventy-five calendar days of receipt of all necessary documentation from the applicant or the applicantâs designee. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2184, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor